anl/cwd_vs_crk/cwd_verb_affixes.lexc
LEXICON VTAt_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>inân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>ik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:%>inân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>ii2hkâhk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+1PlO:%>ii2hkâhk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>ii2hkîk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>ik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+12Pl+3SgO:%>âtân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+12Pl+3PlO:%>âtânik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>i2hk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i2hkwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>âhkanik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+12Pl+3SgO:%>âhkahk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+12Pl+3PlO:%>âhkahkik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East:%>âhkanik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>âhkîk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>âhkîkwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTAi_IMP_NULL
VTAi_IMP_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTAi_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTAi_IMP_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>in VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>ii2hkan VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:%>i VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>âhkan VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTAi_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>inân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>ik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:%>inân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>ii2hkâhk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+1PlO:%>ii2hkâhk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>ii2hkîk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>ik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+12Pl+3SgO:%>âtân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+12Pl+3PlO:%>âtânik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>i2hk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i2hkwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>âhkanik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+12Pl+3SgO:%>âhkahk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+12Pl+3PlO:%>âhkahkik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East:%>âhkanik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>âhkîk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>âhkîkwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTA_FUT_CON_NULL
VTA_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTA_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTA_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+2Sg+1SgO:%>iyani       VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+3SgO:%>aki	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>aci	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2maki	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2maci	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>âci	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>âthici      VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:%>i2mâci      VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+2SgO:%>i2tâni	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+1SgO:%>ici		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>i2ski		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2mici	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2miski	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2koci		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2kothici		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTA_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+2Sg+1PlO:%>iyâhki       VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>iyîko       VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+1SgO:%>iyîko       VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>akwâwi	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>atwâwi	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>âyâhki	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East:%>akihci	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>âyâhkwâwi	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East:%>akihci	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+3SgO:%>âyahki	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East:%>ahki	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+3PlO:%>âyahkwâwi   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East:%>ahkwayak   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>âyîko	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>âyîkwâwi	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East:%>ayîko	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyâhki	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyahki	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyîko	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+1SgO:%>i2kawiyâni    VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+2SgO:%>i2kawiyani    VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+1PlO:%>i2kawiyâhki   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+12PlO:%>i2kawiyahki   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+2PlO:%>i2kawiyîko   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+3SgO:%>i2hci   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+3PlO:%>i2htwâwi  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mihci  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>âtwâwi     VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>i2mâtwâwi      VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+2SgO:%>i2tâhki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>i2tahkwâwi	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>i2tahkwâwi	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+1SgO:%>itwâwi	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2skwâwi		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>i2koyâhki		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East:%>i2tahkwâwi		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+12PlO:%>i2koyahki		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East:%>iyamihci		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>i2koyâhkwâwi		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East:%>i2tahkwâwi		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+12PlO:%>i2koyahki 		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+12PlO:%>i2koyahkwâwi		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East:%>i2tahkwâwi		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>i2koyîko		   VERB_ENDLEX ; 
+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East:%>i2tîko		   VERB_ENDLEX ; 
+3Pl+2PlO:%>i2koyîkwâwi		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East:%>i2tîko		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2koyâhki	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:%>i2koyahki	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2koyîko	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2kotwâwi		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VERB_ENDLEX
@D.frag.FRAG@@D.cnj.CC@@R.joiner.NULL@+Err/Orth:@D.frag.FRAG@@D.cnj.CC@@R.joiner.NULL@ # ;
@D.frag.FRAG@@D.cnj.CC@@D.joiner.NULL@ # ;
@D.frag.FRAG@@R.cnj.CC@@R.joiner.NULL@+Err/Orth:@D.frag.FRAG@@R.cnj.CC@@R.joiner.NULL@%^IC # ;
@D.frag.FRAG@@R.cnj.CC@@D.joiner.NULL@:@D.frag.FRAG@@R.cnj.CC@@D.joiner.NULL@%^IC # ;
@R.frag.FRAG@ VERB_FRAG_END ;
LEXICON VERB_FRAG
@R.frag.FRAG@_:@R.frag.FRAG@ VERB_FRAG_ORDER ;
LEXICON VERB_FRAG_ORDER
@R.order.indep@+Ind:@R.order.indep@          VERB_FRAG_IND_PERSON ;
@R.order.cnj@+Cnj:@R.order.cnj@              VERB_FRAG_END ;
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@              VERB_FRAG_END ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@   VERB_FRAG_END ;
LEXICON VERB_FRAG_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NI@+1:@U.person.NI@     VERB_FRAG_END ;
@U.person.KI@+2:@U.person.KI@     VERB_FRAG_END ;
@U.person.NULL@+3:@U.person.NULL@ VERB_FRAG_END ;
LEXICON VERB_FRAG_END
@D.cnj.CC@+Err/Frag:@D.cnj.CC@0    # ;
@R.cnj.CC@+Err/Frag:@R.cnj.CC@%^IC # ;
